District of Columbia statutes.
7-1405.01

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by act within the 30-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.

July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 7a
as added Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-109, § 2, 51 DCR 1342
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Health Care Privatization Rulemaking Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-54, December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1789).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Health Care Privatization Rulemaking Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-126, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6831).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Health Care Privatization Rulemaking Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-213, November 7, 2003, 50 DCR 10009).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Health Care Privatization Rulemaking Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-326, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1593).
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 14-18, the “Health Care Privatization Amendment Act of 2001”, see Mayor’s Order 2004-127, August 2, 2004 ( 51 DCR 8008).

Resolution 16-607, the “Health Care Safety Net Administration Rulemaking Amendments Emergency Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective April 4, 2006.

Resolution 18-149, the “Eligibility Criteria Amendment for the HealthCare Alliance Program Approval Resolution of 2009”, was approved effective June 2, 2009.

Resolution 18-343, the “Residency Criteria Amendment for the HealthCare Alliance Program Approval Resolution of 2009”, was approved effective December 15, 2009.